Illinois, session 104th, SB807.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Unemployment Insurance Act is amended by 5changing Sections 401, 403, 700, 1505, 1506.6, and 2800 as 6follows: 7    (820 ILCS 405/401)  (from Ch. 48, par. 401)8    Sec. 401. Weekly Benefit Amount - Dependents' Allowances. 9    (I) A. With respect to any week beginning in a benefit year 10beginning prior to January 4, 2004, an individual's weekly 11benefit amount shall be an amount equal to the weekly benefit 12amount as defined in the provisions of this Act as amended and 13in effect on November 18, 2011. 14    B. 1. With respect to any benefit year beginning on or 15after January 4, 2004 and before January 6, 2008, an 16individual's weekly benefit amount shall be 48% of the 17individual's prior average weekly wage, rounded (if not 18already a multiple of one dollar) to the next higher dollar; 19provided, however, that the weekly benefit amount cannot 20exceed the maximum weekly benefit amount and cannot be less 21than $51. Except as otherwise provided in this Section, with 22respect to any benefit year beginning on or after January 6, 232008, an individual's weekly benefit amount shall be 47% of   SB0807 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 07206 SPS 17243 b1the individual's prior average weekly wage, rounded (if not 2already a multiple of one dollar) to the next higher dollar; 3provided, however, that the weekly benefit amount cannot 4exceed the maximum weekly benefit amount and cannot be less 5than $51. With respect to any benefit year beginning on or 6after January 1, 2029 2027 and before January 1, 2030 2028, an 7individual's weekly benefit amount shall be 40.8% 40.6% of the 8individual's prior average weekly wage, rounded (if not 9already a multiple of one dollar) to the next higher dollar; 10provided, however, that the weekly benefit amount cannot 11exceed the maximum weekly benefit amount and cannot be less 12than $51. 13    2. For the purposes of this subsection: 14    An individual's "prior average weekly wage" means the 15total wages for insured work paid to that individual during 16the 2 calendar quarters of the individual's base period in 17which such total wages were highest, divided by 26. If the 18quotient is not already a multiple of one dollar, it shall be 19rounded to the nearest dollar; however if the quotient is 20equally near 2 multiples of one dollar, it shall be rounded to 21the higher multiple of one dollar. 22    "Determination date" means June 1 and December 1 of each 23calendar year except that, for the purposes of this Act only, 24there shall be no June 1 determination date in any year. 25    "Determination period" means, with respect to each June 1 26determination date, the 12 consecutive calendar months ending   SB0807 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 07206 SPS 17243 b1on the immediately preceding December 31 and, with respect to 2each December 1 determination date, the 12 consecutive 3calendar months ending on the immediately preceding June 30. 4    "Benefit period" means the 12 consecutive calendar month 5period beginning on the first day of the first calendar month 6immediately following a determination date, except that, with 7respect to any calendar year in which there is a June 1 8determination date, "benefit period" shall mean the 6 9consecutive calendar month period beginning on the first day 10of the first calendar month immediately following the 11preceding December 1 determination date and the 6 consecutive 12calendar month period beginning on the first day of the first 13calendar month immediately following the June 1 determination 14date. 15    "Gross wages" means all the wages paid to individuals 16during the determination period immediately preceding a 17determination date for insured work, and reported to the 18Director by employers prior to the first day of the third 19calendar month preceding that date. 20    "Covered employment" for any calendar month means the 21total number of individuals, as determined by the Director, 22engaged in insured work at mid-month. 23    "Average monthly covered employment" means one-twelfth of 24the sum of the covered employment for the 12 months of a 25determination period. 26    "Statewide average annual wage" means the quotient,   SB0807 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 07206 SPS 17243 b1obtained by dividing gross wages by average monthly covered 2employment for the same determination period, rounded (if not 3already a multiple of one cent) to the nearest cent. 4    "Statewide average weekly wage" means the quotient, 5obtained by dividing the statewide average annual wage by 52, 6rounded (if not already a multiple of one cent) to the nearest 7cent. Notwithstanding any provision of this Section to the 8contrary, the statewide average weekly wage for any benefit 9period prior to calendar year 2012 shall be as determined by 10the provisions of this Act as amended and in effect on November 1118, 2011. Notwithstanding any provisions of this Section to 12the contrary, the statewide average weekly wage for the 13benefit period of calendar year 2012 shall be $856.55 and for 14each calendar year thereafter, the statewide average weekly 15wage shall be the statewide average weekly wage, as determined 16in accordance with this sentence, for the immediately 17preceding benefit period plus (or minus) an amount equal to 18the percentage change in the statewide average weekly wage, as 19computed in accordance with the first sentence of this 20paragraph, between the 2 immediately preceding benefit 21periods, multiplied by the statewide average weekly wage, as 22determined in accordance with this sentence, for the 23immediately preceding benefit period. However, for purposes of 24the Workers' Compensation Act, the statewide average weekly 25wage will be computed using June 1 and December 1 26determination dates of each calendar year and such   SB0807 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 07206 SPS 17243 b1determination shall not be subject to the limitation of the 2statewide average weekly wage as computed in accordance with 3the preceding sentence of this paragraph. 4    With respect to any week beginning in a benefit year 5beginning prior to January 4, 2004, "maximum weekly benefit 6amount" with respect to each week beginning within a benefit 7period shall be as defined in the provisions of this Act as 8amended and in effect on November 18, 2011. 9    With respect to any benefit year beginning on or after 10January 4, 2004 and before January 6, 2008, "maximum weekly 11benefit amount" with respect to each week beginning within a 12benefit period means 48% of the statewide average weekly wage, 13rounded (if not already a multiple of one dollar) to the next 14higher dollar.15    Except as otherwise provided in this Section, with respect 16to any benefit year beginning on or after January 6, 2008, 17"maximum weekly benefit amount" with respect to each week 18beginning within a benefit period means 47% of the statewide 19average weekly wage, rounded (if not already a multiple of one 20dollar) to the next higher dollar. 21    With respect to any benefit year beginning on or after 22January 1, 2029 2027 and before January 1, 2030 2028, "maximum 23weekly benefit amount" with respect to each week beginning 24within a benefit period means 40.8% 40.6% of the statewide 25average weekly wage, rounded (if not already a multiple of one 26dollar) to the next higher dollar.   SB0807 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 07206 SPS 17243 b1    C. With respect to any week beginning in a benefit year 2beginning prior to January 4, 2004, an individual's 3eligibility for a dependent allowance with respect to a 4nonworking spouse or one or more dependent children shall be 5as defined by the provisions of this Act as amended and in 6effect on November 18, 2011. 7    With respect to any benefit year beginning on or after 8January 4, 2004 and before January 6, 2008, an individual to 9whom benefits are payable with respect to any week shall, in 10addition to those benefits, be paid, with respect to such 11week, as follows: in the case of an individual with a 12nonworking spouse, 9% of the individual's prior average weekly 13wage, rounded (if not already a multiple of one dollar) to the 14next higher dollar, provided, that the total amount payable to 15the individual with respect to a week shall not exceed 57% of 16the statewide average weekly wage, rounded (if not already a 17multiple of one dollar) to the next higher dollar; and in the 18case of an individual with a dependent child or dependent 19children, 17.2% of the individual's prior average weekly wage, 20rounded (if not already a multiple of one dollar) to the next 21higher dollar, provided that the total amount payable to the 22individual with respect to a week shall not exceed 65.2% of the 23statewide average weekly wage, rounded (if not already a 24multiple of one dollar) to the next higher dollar.25    With respect to any benefit year beginning on or after 26January 6, 2008 and before January 1, 2010, an individual to   SB0807 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 07206 SPS 17243 b1whom benefits are payable with respect to any week shall, in 2addition to those benefits, be paid, with respect to such 3week, as follows: in the case of an individual with a 4nonworking spouse, 9% of the individual's prior average weekly 5wage, rounded (if not already a multiple of one dollar) to the 6next higher dollar, provided, that the total amount payable to 7the individual with respect to a week shall not exceed 56% of 8the statewide average weekly wage, rounded (if not already a 9multiple of one dollar) to the next higher dollar; and in the 10case of an individual with a dependent child or dependent 11children, 18.2% of the individual's prior average weekly wage, 12rounded (if not already a multiple of one dollar) to the next 13higher dollar, provided that the total amount payable to the 14individual with respect to a week shall not exceed 65.2% of the 15statewide average weekly wage, rounded (if not already a 16multiple of one dollar) to the next higher dollar.17    The additional amount paid pursuant to this subsection in 18the case of an individual with a dependent child or dependent 19children shall be referred to as the "dependent child 20allowance", and the percentage rate by which an individual's 21prior average weekly wage is multiplied pursuant to this 22subsection to calculate the dependent child allowance shall be 23referred to as the "dependent child allowance rate".24    Except as otherwise provided in this Section, with respect 25to any benefit year beginning on or after January 1, 2010, an 26individual to whom benefits are payable with respect to any   SB0807 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 07206 SPS 17243 b1week shall, in addition to those benefits, be paid, with 2respect to such week, as follows: in the case of an individual 3with a nonworking spouse, the greater of (i) 9% of the 4individual's prior average weekly wage, rounded (if not 5already a multiple of one dollar) to the next higher dollar, or 6(ii) $15, provided that the total amount payable to the 7individual with respect to a week shall not exceed 56% of the 8statewide average weekly wage, rounded (if not already a 9multiple of one dollar) to the next higher dollar; and in the 10case of an individual with a dependent child or dependent 11children, the greater of (i) the product of the dependent 12child allowance rate multiplied by the individual's prior 13average weekly wage, rounded (if not already a multiple of one 14dollar) to the next higher dollar, or (ii) the lesser of $50 or 1550% of the individual's weekly benefit amount, rounded (if not 16already a multiple of one dollar) to the next higher dollar, 17provided that the total amount payable to the individual with 18respect to a week shall not exceed the product of the statewide 19average weekly wage multiplied by the sum of 47% plus the 20dependent child allowance rate, rounded (if not already a 21multiple of one dollar) to the next higher dollar. 22    With respect to any benefit year beginning on or after 23January 1, 2029 2027 and before January 1, 2030 2028, an 24individual to whom benefits are payable with respect to any 25week shall, in addition to those benefits, be paid, with 26respect to such week, as follows: in the case of an individual   SB0807 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 07206 SPS 17243 b1with a nonworking spouse, the greater of (i) 9% of the 2individual's prior average weekly wage, rounded (if not 3already a multiple of one dollar) to the next higher dollar, or 4(ii) $15, provided that the total amount payable to the 5individual with respect to a week shall not exceed 49.8% 49.6% 6of the statewide average weekly wage, rounded (if not already 7a multiple of one dollar) to the next higher dollar; and in the 8case of an individual with a dependent child or dependent 9children, the greater of (i) the product of the dependent 10child allowance rate multiplied by the individual's prior 11average weekly wage, rounded (if not already a multiple of one 12dollar) to the next higher dollar, or (ii) the lesser of $50 or 1350% of the individual's weekly benefit amount, rounded (if not 14already a multiple of one dollar) to the next higher dollar, 15provided that the total amount payable to the individual with 16respect to a week shall not exceed the product of the statewide 17average weekly wage multiplied by the sum of 40.8% 40.6% plus 18the dependent child allowance rate, rounded (if not already a 19multiple of one dollar) to the next higher dollar. 20    With respect to each benefit year beginning after calendar 21year 2012, the dependent child allowance rate shall be the sum 22of the allowance adjustment applicable pursuant to Section 231400.1 to the calendar year in which the benefit year begins, 24plus the dependent child allowance rate with respect to each 25benefit year beginning in the immediately preceding calendar 26year, except as otherwise provided in this subsection. The   SB0807 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 07206 SPS 17243 b1dependent child allowance rate with respect to each benefit 2year beginning in calendar year 2010 shall be 17.9%. The 3dependent child allowance rate with respect to each benefit 4year beginning in calendar year 2011 shall be 17.4%. The 5dependent child allowance rate with respect to each benefit 6year beginning in calendar year 2012 shall be 17.0% and, with 7respect to each benefit year beginning after calendar year 82012, shall not be less than 17.0% or greater than 17.9%. 9    For the purposes of this subsection: 10    "Dependent" means a child or a nonworking spouse. 11    "Child" means a natural child, stepchild, or adopted child 12of an individual claiming benefits under this Act or a child 13who is in the custody of any such individual by court order, 14for whom the individual is supplying and, for at least 90 15consecutive days (or for the duration of the parental 16relationship if it has existed for less than 90 days) 17immediately preceding any week with respect to which the 18individual has filed a claim, has supplied more than one-half 19the cost of support, or has supplied at least 1/4 of the cost 20of support if the individual and the other parent, together, 21are supplying and, during the aforesaid period, have supplied 22more than one-half the cost of support, and are, and were 23during the aforesaid period, members of the same household; 24and who, on the first day of such week (a) is under 18 years of 25age, or (b) is, and has been during the immediately preceding 2690 days, unable to work because of illness or other   SB0807 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 07206 SPS 17243 b1disability: provided, that no person who has been determined 2to be a child of an individual who has been allowed benefits 3with respect to a week in the individual's benefit year shall 4be deemed to be a child of the other parent, and no other 5person shall be determined to be a child of such other parent, 6during the remainder of that benefit year. 7    "Nonworking spouse" means the lawful husband or wife of an 8individual claiming benefits under this Act, for whom more 9than one-half the cost of support has been supplied by the 10individual for at least 90 consecutive days (or for the 11duration of the marital relationship if it has existed for 12less than 90 days) immediately preceding any week with respect 13to which the individual has filed a claim, but only if the 14nonworking spouse is currently ineligible to receive benefits 15under this Act by reason of the provisions of Section 500E. 16    An individual who was obligated by law to provide for the 17support of a child or of a nonworking spouse for the aforesaid 18period of 90 consecutive days, but was prevented by illness or 19injury from doing so, shall be deemed to have provided more 20than one-half the cost of supporting the child or nonworking 21spouse for that period. 22    (II) (Blank).23(Source: P.A. 102-671, eff. 11-30-21; 102-700, eff. 4-19-22; 24102-1105, eff. 1-1-23; 103-1059, eff. 12-20-24.) 25    (820 ILCS 405/403)  (from Ch. 48, par. 403)  SB0807 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 07206 SPS 17243 b1    Sec. 403. Maximum total amount of benefits. 2    (I) A. With respect to any benefit year beginning prior to 3September 30, 1979, any otherwise eligible individual shall be 4entitled, during such benefit year, to a maximum total amount 5of benefits as shall be determined in the manner set forth in 6this Act as amended and in effect on November 9, 1977.7    B. With respect to any benefit year beginning on or after 8September 30, 1979, except as otherwise provided in this 9Section, any otherwise eligible individual shall be entitled, 10during such benefit year, to a maximum total amount of 11benefits equal to 26 times the individual's weekly benefit 12amount plus dependents' allowances, or to the total wages for 13insured work paid to such individual during the individual's 14base period, whichever amount is smaller. With respect to any 15benefit year beginning in calendar year 2012, any otherwise 16eligible individual shall be entitled, during such benefit 17year, to a maximum total amount of benefits equal to 25 times 18the individual's weekly benefit amount plus dependents' 19allowances, or to the total wages for insured work paid to such 20individual during the individual's base period, whichever 21amount is smaller. With respect to any benefit year beginning 22on or after January 1, 2029 2027 and before January 1, 2030 232028, any otherwise eligible individual shall be entitled, 24during such benefit year, to a maximum total amount of 25benefits equal to 24 23 times the individual's weekly benefit 26amount plus dependents' allowances, or to the total wages for   SB0807 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 07206 SPS 17243 b1insured work paid to such individual during the individual's 2base period, whichever amount is smaller.3    (II) (Blank).4(Source: P.A. 102-671, eff. 11-30-21; 102-700, eff. 4-19-22; 5102-1105, eff. 1-1-23; 103-1059, eff. 12-20-24.) 6    (820 ILCS 405/700)  (from Ch. 48, par. 450)7    Sec. 700. Filing claims for benefits. 8    A. Claims for benefits shall be made in accordance with 9such regulations as the Director may prescribe. Each employer 10shall post and maintain printed statements concerning such 11regulations or such other matters as the Director may by 12regulation prescribe in places readily accessible to 13individuals in such employer's service. Each employer shall 14supply to such individuals copies of such printed statements 15or materials relating to claims for benefits as the Director 16may by regulation prescribe. Such printed statements shall be 17supplied by the Director to each employer without cost to the 18employer.19    B. 1. When an employer employing 75 or more employees in 20this State at any point in time during the calendar year 21immediately preceding the calendar year in which a layoff or 22separation occurs resulting in the separation of 50 or more 23employees at a single site of employment, excluding part-time 24employees as defined in subsection (e) of Section 5 of the 25Illinois Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification Act,   SB0807 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 07206 SPS 17243 b1conducts such a layoff or separation, the employer shall 2submit the name of each separated employee, each separated 3employee's social security number, the beginning date of each 4employee's separation, and, if applicable, the return to work 5date for each such employee, to the Department in the secure 6manner prescribed by the Department. Submissions required by 7this subsection shall be sent to the Department as soon as 8practicable prior to the beginning of any such separation.9    2. Submission of the information by an employer in 10accordance with this subsection shall not be construed as a 11determination of eligibility for unemployment insurance 12benefits, and shall have no effect on an individual or 13employing unit's rights or responsibilities as set forth in 14this Act unless specifically stated. The Department may adopt 15rules necessary to implement and administer this subsection. 16The Department is authorized to enter into an appropriate 17agreement with the Department of Commerce and Economic 18Opportunity to provide information submitted under this 19subsection to assist in the coordination of layoff response 20activities.21    3. In no event shall this subsection apply to any employer 22with respect to employees working in the construction industry 23who are covered by a bona fide collective bargaining agreement 24with a labor organization.25    4. For the purposes of this subsection:26    "Construction industry" means any constructing, altering,   SB0807 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 07206 SPS 17243 b1reconstructing, repairing, rehabilitating, refinishing, 2refurbishing, remodeling, remediating, renovating, custom 3fabricating, maintenance, landscaping, improving, wrecking, 4painting, decorating, demolishing, and adding to or 5subtracting from any building, structure, highway, roadway, 6street, bridge, alley, sewer, ditch, sewage disposal plant, 7water works, parking facility, railroad, excavation, or other 8structure, project, development, or real property, or 9improvement, or to any part thereof, including moving 10construction-related materials on the job site to or from the 11job site, snow plowing, snow removal, and refuse collection, 12whether or not the performance of the work involves the 13addition to, or fabrication into, any structure, project, 14development, or real property, or improvement, of any material 15or article of merchandise. 16    "Single site of employment" has the meaning set forth in 1756 Ill. Adm. Code 230.120. 18(Source: Laws 1951, p. 32.) 19    (820 ILCS 405/1505)  (from Ch. 48, par. 575)20    Sec. 1505. Adjustment of state experience factor. 21    (I) A. For calendar years prior to 1988, the state 22experience factor shall be adjusted in accordance with the 23provisions of this Act as amended and in effect on November 18, 242011. 25    B. (Blank).   SB0807 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 07206 SPS 17243 b1    C. For calendar year 1988 and each calendar year 2thereafter, for which the state experience factor is being 3determined. 4        1. For every $50,000,000 (or fraction thereof) by 5    which the adjusted trust fund balance falls below the 6    target balance set forth in this subsection, the state 7    experience factor for the succeeding year shall be 8    increased one percent absolute. 9        For every $50,000,000 (or fraction thereof) by which 10    the adjusted trust fund balance exceeds the target balance 11    set forth in this subsection, the state experience factor 12    for the succeeding year shall be decreased by one percent 13    absolute. 14        The target balance in each calendar year prior to 2003 15    is $750,000,000. The target balance in calendar year 2003 16    is $920,000,000. The target balance in calendar year 2004 17    is $960,000,000. The target balance in calendar year 2005 18    and each calendar year through 2022 is $1,000,000,000. The 19    target balance in calendar year 2023 and each calendar 20    year thereafter is $1,750,000,000. 21        2. For the purposes of this subsection: 22        "Net trust fund balance" is the amount standing to the 23    credit of this State's account in the unemployment trust 24    fund as of June 30 of the calendar year immediately 25    preceding the year for which a state experience factor is 26    being determined.   SB0807 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 07206 SPS 17243 b1        "Adjusted trust fund balance" is the net trust fund 2    balance minus the sum of the benefit reserves for fund 3    building for July 1, 1987 through June 30 of the year prior 4    to the year for which the state experience factor is being 5    determined. The adjusted trust fund balance shall not be 6    less than zero. If the preceding calculation results in a 7    number which is less than zero, the amount by which it is 8    less than zero shall reduce the sum of the benefit 9    reserves for fund building for subsequent years. 10        For the purpose of determining the state experience 11    factor for 1989 and for each calendar year thereafter, the 12    following "benefit reserves for fund building" shall apply 13    for each state experience factor calculation in which that 14    12 month period is applicable: 15            a. For the 12 month period ending on June 30, 1988, 16        the "benefit reserve for fund building" shall be 17        8/104th of the total benefits paid from January 1, 18        1988 through June 30, 1988. 19            b. For the 12 month period ending on June 30, 1989, 20        the "benefit reserve for fund building" shall be the 21        sum of: 22                i. 8/104ths of the total benefits paid from 23            July 1, 1988 through December 31, 1988, plus 24                ii. 4/108ths of the total benefits paid from 25            January 1, 1989 through June 30, 1989. 26            c. For the 12 month period ending on June 30, 1990,   SB0807 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 07206 SPS 17243 b1        the "benefit reserve for fund building" shall be 2        4/108ths of the total benefits paid from July 1, 1989 3        through December 31, 1989. 4            d. For 1992 and for each calendar year thereafter, 5        the "benefit reserve for fund building" for the 12 6        month period ending on June 30, 1991 and for each 7        subsequent 12 month period shall be zero. 8        3. Notwithstanding the preceding provisions of this 9    subsection, for calendar years 1988 through 2003, the 10    state experience factor shall not be increased or 11    decreased by more than 15 percent absolute. 12    D. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection C, the 13adjusted state experience factor: 14        1. Shall be 111 percent for calendar year 1988; 15        2. Shall not be less than 75 percent nor greater than 16    135 percent for calendar years 1989 through 2003; and 17    shall not be less than 75% nor greater than 150% for 18    calendar year 2004 and each calendar year thereafter, not 19    counting any increase pursuant to subsection D-1, D-2, or 20    D-3; 21        3. Shall not be decreased by more than 5 percent 22    absolute for any calendar year, beginning in calendar year 23    1989 and through calendar year 1992, by more than 6% 24    absolute for calendar years 1993 through 1995, by more 25    than 10% absolute for calendar years 1999 through 2003 and 26    by more than 12% absolute for calendar year 2004 and each   SB0807 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 07206 SPS 17243 b1    calendar year thereafter, from the adjusted state 2    experience factor of the calendar year preceding the 3    calendar year for which the adjusted state experience 4    factor is being determined; 5        4. Shall not be increased by more than 15% absolute 6    for calendar year 1993, by more than 14% absolute for 7    calendar years 1994 and 1995, by more than 10% absolute 8    for calendar years 1999 through 2003 and by more than 16% 9    absolute for calendar year 2004 and each calendar year 10    thereafter, from the adjusted state experience factor for 11    the calendar year preceding the calendar year for which 12    the adjusted state experience factor is being determined; 13        5. Shall be 100% for calendar years 1996, 1997, and 14    1998. 15    D-1. The adjusted state experience factor for each of 16calendar years 2013 through 2015 shall be increased by 5% 17absolute above the adjusted state experience factor as 18calculated without regard to this subsection. The adjusted 19state experience factor for each of calendar years 2016 20through 2018 shall be increased by 6% absolute above the 21adjusted state experience factor as calculated without regard 22to this subsection. The increase in the adjusted state 23experience factor for calendar year 2018 pursuant to this 24subsection shall not be counted for purposes of applying 25paragraph 3 or 4 of subsection D to the calculation of the 26adjusted state experience factor for calendar year 2019.   SB0807 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 07206 SPS 17243 b1    D-2. (Blank). 2    D-3. The adjusted state experience factor for calendar 3year 2029 2027 shall be increased by 20% absolute above the 4adjusted state experience factor as calculated without regard 5to this subsection. The increase in the adjusted state 6experience factor for calendar year 2029 2027 pursuant to this 7subsection shall not be counted for purposes of applying 8paragraph 3 or 4 of subsection D to the calculation of the 9adjusted state experience factor for calendar year 2030 2028. 10    D-4. The adjusted state experience factor for calendar 11years beginning in 2024 shall be increased by 3% absolute 12above the adjusted state experience factor as calculated 13without regard to this subsection or subsection D-3. The 14increase in the state experience factor provided for in this 15subsection shall not be counted for purposes of applying 16paragraph 3 or 4 of subsection D to the calculation of the 17adjusted state experience factor for the following calendar 18year. This subsection shall cease to be operative beginning 19January 1 of the calendar year following the calendar year in 20which the total amount of the transfers of funds provided for 21in subsection B of Part (I) of Section 2101.1 equals the total 22amount of the appropriation. 23    E. The amount standing to the credit of this State's 24account in the unemployment trust fund as of June 30 shall be 25deemed to include as part thereof (a) any amount receivable on 26that date from any Federal governmental agency, or as a   SB0807 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 07206 SPS 17243 b1payment in lieu of contributions under the provisions of 2Sections 1403 and 1405 B and paragraph 2 of Section 302C, in 3reimbursement of benefits paid to individuals, and (b) amounts 4credited by the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States 5to this State's account in the unemployment trust fund 6pursuant to Section 903 of the Federal Social Security Act, as 7amended, including any such amounts which have been 8appropriated by the General Assembly in accordance with the 9provisions of Section 2100 B for expenses of administration, 10except any amounts which have been obligated on or before that 11date pursuant to such appropriation. 12    (II) (Blank).13(Source: P.A. 102-671, eff. 11-30-21; 102-700, eff. 4-19-22; 14102-1105, eff. 1-1-23; 103-1059, eff. 12-20-24.) 15    (820 ILCS 405/1506.6)16    Sec. 1506.6. Surcharge; specified period. 17    (I) For each employer whose contribution rate for calendar 18year 2029 2027 is determined pursuant to Section 1500 or 191506.1, in addition to the contribution rate established 20pursuant to Section 1506.3, an additional surcharge of 0.350% 21shall be added to the contribution rate. The surcharge 22established by this Section shall be due at the same time as 23other contributions with respect to the quarter are due, as 24provided in Section 1400. Payments attributable to the 25surcharge established pursuant to this Section shall be   SB0807 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 07206 SPS 17243 b1contributions and deposited into the clearing account.2    (II) (Blank).3(Source: P.A. 102-671, eff. 11-30-21; 102-700, eff. 4-19-22; 4102-1105, eff. 1-1-23; 103-1059, eff. 12-20-24.) 5    (820 ILCS 405/2800)  (from Ch. 48, par. 780)6    Sec. 2800. Violations and penalties. 7    A. It shall be unlawful for any person or employing unit 8to--9        1. Make a false statement or representation or fail to 10    disclose a material fact:11            a. To obtain, or increase, or prevent, or reduce 12        any benefit or payment under the provisions of this 13        Act, or under the unemployment compensation law of any 14        State or the Federal Government, either for himself or 15        for any other person; or16            b. To avoid or reduce any contribution or other 17        payment required from an employing unit under this 18        Act.19        2. Fail to pay a contribution due under the provisions 20    of this Act.21        3. Fail to furnish any report, audit, or information 22    duly required by the Director under this Act.23        4. Refuse to allow the Director or his duly authorized 24    representative to inspect or copy the pay roll or other 25    records or documents relative to the enforcement of this   SB0807 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 07206 SPS 17243 b1    Act or required by this Act.2        5. Make any deduction from the wages of any individual 3    in its employ because of its liability for the payment of 4    contributions required by this Act.5        6. Knowingly fail to furnish to any individual in its 6    employ any notice, report, or information duly required 7    under the provisions of this Act or the rules or 8    regulations of the Director.9        7. Attempt to induce any individual, directly or 10    indirectly (by promise of re-employment or by threat not 11    to employ or not to re-employ or by any other means), to 12    refrain from claiming or accepting benefits or to waive 13    any other rights under this Act; or to maintain a rehiring 14    policy which discriminates against former individuals in 15    its employ by reason of their having claimed benefits.16        8. Pay contributions upon wages for services not 17    rendered for such employing unit if the purpose of such 18    payment is either to reduce the amount of contributions 19    due or to become due from any employing unit or to affect 20    the benefit rights of any individual.21        9. Solicit, or aid or abet the solicitation of, 22    information from any individual concerning his place of 23    employment, residence, assets or earnings, by any means 24    which are intended to mislead such individual to believe 25    that the person or employing unit seeking such information 26    is the Department or one of its Divisions or branches, or a   SB0807 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 07206 SPS 17243 b1    representative thereof.2    B. Except as provided in subsection C, any Any employing 3unit or person who willfully violates any provision of this 4Section or any other provision of this Act or any rule or 5regulation promulgated thereunder, or does any act prohibited 6by this Act, or who fails, neglects, or refuses to perform any 7duty required by any provision of this Act or rule or 8regulation of the Director, within the time prescribed by the 9Director, for which no penalty has been specifically provided, 10or who fails, neglects, or refuses to obey any lawful order 11given or made by the Director, shall be guilty of a Class B 12misdemeanor, and each such act, failure, neglect, or refusal 13shall constitute a separate and distinct offense. An employing 14unit's or person's willful filing of a fraudulent quarterly 15wage report shall constitute a Class 4 felony if the amount of 16contributions owed with respect to the quarter is less than 17$300 and a Class 3 felony if the amount of contributions owed 18with respect to the quarter is $300 or more. An employing 19unit's or person's willful failure to honor a subpoena issued 20by the Department shall constitute a Class 4 felony. If a 21person or employing unit described in this Section is a 22corporation, the president, the secretary, and the treasurer, 23and any other officer exercising corresponding functions, 24shall each be subject to the aforesaid penalties for the 25violation of any provisions of this Section of which he or they 26had or, in the exercise of his or their duties, ought to have   SB0807 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 07206 SPS 17243 b1had knowledge, not including the provisions regarding the 2filing of a fraudulent quarterly wage report or the willful 3failure to honor a subpoena.4    C. An employer that willfully fails to comply with the 5requirements of subsection B of Section 700 may be subject to a 6civil penalty of not more than $750 for each day of the 7employer's violation after the separations begin to occur, as 8determined by the Department. 9(Source: P.A. 98-107, eff. 7-23-13.) 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 111, 2027.